Arkansas, session 2025, SB175.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 11-10-310(f), concerning the Director of
the Division of Workforce Services and personnel of the Division of Workforce
Services, is reenacted to ratify the decision by the Arkansas Code Revision
Commission to change references to “this section” to “this subsection and
subsection (e) of this section” in order to correct reference errors to read
as follows:
(f) If the division requests continuation of a growth pool position as
established under this subsection and subsection (e) of this section, the
position shall be requested as a new position in the division's next budget
request. Determining the maximum number of employees and the maximum amount
of appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal
year is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished
by delineating such maximums in the appropriation act or acts for a state
agency and the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund
account by amendment to the Revenue Stabilization Law, § 19-5-101 et seq.
Further, the General Assembly has determined that the division may operate
*CRH001*
01/31/2025 10:12:08 AM CRH001

SB175
more efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the division authorizing
broad powers under this subsection and subsection (e) of this section.
Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly
maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or
Joint Budget Committee as provided by this subsection and subsection (e) of
this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint
Budget Committee is not a severable part of this subsection and subsection
(e) of this section. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative
Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of
competent jurisdiction, this entire subsection and subsection (e) of this
section are void.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. CONSTRUCTION AND LEGISLATIVE INTENT.
It is the intent of the General Assembly that:
(1) The enactment and adoption of this act shall not expressly
or impliedly repeal an act passed during the regular session of the Ninety-
Fifth General Assembly;
(2) To the extent that a conflict exists between an act of the
regular session of the Ninety-Fifth General Assembly and this act:
(A) The act of the regular session of the Ninety-Fifth
General Assembly shall be treated as a subsequent act passed by the General
Assembly for the purposes of:
(i) Giving the act of the regular session of the
Ninety-Fifth General Assembly its full force and effect; and
(ii) Amending or repealing the appropriate parts of
the Arkansas Code of 1987; and
(B) Section 1-2-107 shall not apply; and
(3) This act shall make only technical, not substantive, changes
to the Arkansas Code of 1987.







01/31/2025 10:12:08 AM CRH001